Wyoming, session 2026, HB0014.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

HB0014

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0001
Section 1. W.S. 6-2-604 and 6-2-605 are created to
read:

6-2-604. Use of force in self-defense; reimbursement
of costs and fees.

(a) If a person who is subject to criminal
prosecution is found not guilty, has had the charges
dismissed or is otherwise released from custody or further
prosecution because the person reasonably used defensive
force in accordance with W.S. 6-2-602, the county where the
person was charged or subject to criminal prosecution shall
reimburse the person for all reasonable costs, including
loss of time, bail costs, attorney fees and other costs and
expenses involved in the person's defense, including the
costs of seeking or receiving an expungement under W.S.
6-2-605.

(b) Reimbursement for a person subject to criminal
prosecution who is found not guilty because the person
reasonably used defensive force under W.S. 6-2-602 shall
not be an independent cause of action. If the trier of fact
in the underlying criminal action determines that a person
HB0014

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0001
is eligible for reimbursement under this section, the court
shall determine the amount of the reimbursement award.

(c) A person subject to criminal prosecution who has
had the charges dismissed or is otherwise released from
custody or further prosecution, because the person
reasonably used defensive force in accordance with W.S.
6-2-602, may file a petition for reimbursement in the court
in the county in which the person was subject to criminal
prosecution. Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
there shall be no filing fee for a petition filed under
this subsection. If the court determines that a person is
eligible for reimbursement under this section, the court
shall then determine the amount of the reimbursement award.

(d) Nothing in this section shall prohibit an action
under the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act to seek a
reimbursement award where none was granted or to seek a
higher award than the one (1) award granted under this
section.

6-2-605. Use of force in self-defense; expungement.

HB0014

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0001
(a) A person subject to criminal prosecution who is
found not guilty, has had the charges dismissed or is
otherwise released from custody or further prosecution
because the person reasonably used defensive force in
accordance with W.S. 6-2-602 may file a petition for
expungement in the court in the county where the person was
subject to criminal prosecution. A person subject to
criminal prosecution who is found not guilty because the
person reasonably used defensive force under W.S. 6-2-602
shall be advised by the court upon acquittal that the
person has the right to immediately file a petition for
expungement under this section.

(b) Any petition for expungement filed under
subsection (a) of this section shall:

(i) Identify the person, the case number and
court in which any criminal prosecution resulting in
acquittal or dismissal occurred, the date and place of
arrest and the law enforcement agency that arrested the
person;

HB0014

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0001
(ii) Include a short, plain statement made under
penalty of perjury of the facts that demonstrate that the
person is entitled to relief under this section;

(iii) Include a request for an order to expunge
all records taken or created in connection with the
criminal prosecution of the person.

(c) If a petition filed under this section concerns a
criminal prosecution that resulted in a dismissal, the
person shall serve a copy of the petition on the district
attorney who prosecuted the criminal prosecution. If the
petition concerns an arrest that did not result in a
prosecution, the person shall serve a copy of the petition
on the law enforcement agency that made the arrest. No
order granting expungement under this section shall be made
less than twenty (20) days after service is made under this
subsection.

(d) The district attorney or law enforcement agency
may file an objection to the petition not later than twenty
(20) days after receipt of service under subsection (c) of
this section. If an objection is filed, the court shall set
HB0014

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0001
the matter for a hearing. If no objection is filed, the
court may summarily enter an order of expungement if the
court finds that the person is otherwise eligible for
expungement under this section.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, there
shall be no filing fee required for any petition for
expungement filed under this section.

(f) If a petition filed under this section concerns a
criminal prosecution that resulted in a finding of not
guilty because the person reasonably used defensive force
under W.S. 6-2-602, the court shall summarily enter an
order of expungement if the court finds that the person is
eligible for expungement under this section.

(g) If the court enters an order of expungement under
this section, the person shall be deemed to have never been
arrested, charged or prosecuted with respect to the matters
and charges that are subject to the order of expungement,
and the person may so swear under oath.

HB0014

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0001
Section 2. W.S. 6-2-601 and 6-2-602(a) and by
creating new subsections (h) and (j) are amended to read:

6-2-601. Applicability of article; definitions.

(a) The common law shall govern in all cases not
governed by this article.

(b) _As used in this article:

(i) "Criminal prosecution" includes the arrest,
charging or prosecution of a person for a criminal offense;

(ii) "Expungement" or "expunge" means to
permanently destroy, delete or erase all records, as
appropriate for the record's physical or electronic form,
so that the record is permanently irretrievable;

(iii) "Record" means any notation of the arrest,
charge, prosecution or disposition maintained in the state
central repository at the division of criminal
investigation, or by any state agency, entity or political
subdivision, whether in paper or electronic format,
HB0014

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0001
including investigatory files of any local, state or
federal criminal justice agency.

6-2-602. Use of force in self-defense; no duty to
retreat; decision of questions.

(a) The use of defensive force, whether actual or
threatened, is reasonable when it is the defensive force
that a reasonable person in like circumstances would judge
necessary to prevent an injury or loss to oneself, another
person or to the person's real or personal property, and no
more, including deadly force if necessary to prevent
imminent death or serious bodily injury to the person
employing the deadly force or to another person. As used in
this subsection, "necessary to prevent" includes a
necessity that arises from an honest belief that the danger
exists whether the danger is real or apparent.

(h) When the issue of the reasonable use of defensive
force in self-defense is decided by a judge, the judge
shall consider the same questions as must be answered under
subsection (j) of this section.

HB0014

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0001
(j) When the issue of the reasonable use of defensive
force in self-defense is submitted to a jury and the jury
has found the defendant not guilty, the court shall
instruct the jury to return a special verdict using the
following form:

1. Was the finding of not guilty based on the reasonable
use of defensive force in self-defense? Yes ___ No ___

2. If your answer to question 1 is "no," do not answer any
remaining questions.

3. If your answer to question 1 is "yes," continue
answering the following questions. Was the defendant:

a. Protecting himself or herself? Yes ___ No ___

b. Protecting his or her family? Yes ___ No ___

c. Protecting his or her real or personal property?
Yes ___ No ___

HB0014

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0001
d. Coming to the aid of another who was in imminent
danger of death or serious bodily injury? Yes ___ No ___

e. Coming to the aid of another who was the victim of
a violent felony? Yes ___ No ___

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0014